District of Columbia statutes.
29-808.03

Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited liability company may be maintained only by a person that is a member at the time the action is commenced and:

(1)

Was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

(2)

Whose status as a member was derived, by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the operating agreement, from a person that was a member at the time the conduct giving rise to the action occurred.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(9)(A), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 903 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.